California statutes. Public Resources Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 542, Sec. 13.   (SB 1181)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 19.5. Carpet Producer Responsibility Program [42968. - 42968.80.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions and General Provisions [42968. - 42968.4.]

42968.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Apprenticeship program” means a program approved by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards for training apprentice and journey-level carpet installers in proper carpet installation, reuse, and recycling practices to maximize the chances of achieving the goals of the program.

(b) “Approved collection site” means a solid waste facility that has agreed to be a collection site for the producer responsibility organization, as described in Section 42968.23.

(c) “Authorized collector” means a person or entity that has entered into an agreement with the producer
 responsibility organization to collect covered products.

(d) “Brand” means a name, symbol, word, or mark that identifies a covered product rather than its components, and attributes the covered product to the owner or licensee of the brand as the producer.

(e) (1) “Carpet” means a floor or stair covering made from thick woven fabric that is used in residential buildings, commercial buildings, conventions, and events, including modular carpet tiles.

(2) Carpet does not include area rugs that are 11 feet by 15 feet in size or smaller.

(f) “Circular economy environmental nongovernmental organization” means a nonprofit organization established to promote a circular economy and to address environmental issues.

(g) “Closed loop recycling” means recycling in which products or materials are reclaimed and returned to the original process or processes in which they were generated and they are reused in the production process.

(h) “Consumer” means a purchaser, owner, or lessee of a covered product, including a person, business, corporation, limited partnership, nonprofit organization, or governmental entity.

(i) (1) “Covered product” means carpet.

(2) “Covered product” does not include carpet that meets the requirements in Section 42357 to be labeled “compostable.”

(j) “Department” means the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery.

(k) “Permanent collection site” means a permanent location in the state where discarded covered product may be returned at no cost, by a consumer or another party on behalf of a consumer, to be reused, recycled, or otherwise managed.

(l) “Postconsumer covered product” means a covered product that is no longer used for its manufactured purpose.

(m) (1) “Postconsumer recycled content” means material derived from postconsumer covered product.

(2) Postconsumer recycled content does not include material derived from recycled beverage containers, as defined in Section 14505.

(n) “Processor” means a company that uses a process, including, but not limited to, shredding, grinding,
 sheering, or depolymerization, to convert discarded covered products into finished recycled output that is ready to be used as an input material for manufacturing products.

(o) (1) “Producer” means a person who manufactures a covered product and who sells, offers for sale, or distributes a covered product in or into the state under that person’s own name or brand.

(2) If there is no person in the state who is the producer for purposes of paragraph (1), the producer of the covered product is the owner or exclusive licensee of a brand or trademark under which the covered product is sold or distributed in or into the state, whether or not the trademark is registered. For purposes of this subdivision, an “exclusive licensee” is a person holding the exclusive right to use a trademark or brand in the state in connection with the manufacture, sale, or distribution
 for sale in or into the state of the covered product.

(3) If there is no person in the state who is the producer for purposes of paragraph (1) or (2), then the producer of the covered product is the party that imports the covered product into the state for sale, distribution, or installation.

(4) If there is no person in the state who is the producer for purposes of paragraph (1), (2), or (3), then the producer of the covered product is the distributor, wholesaler, or retailer who sells the product in or into the state.

(p) “Producer responsibility organization” means either of the following:

(1) An organization that is exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, is formed for the purpose of
 implementing a producer responsibility plan to meet the requirements of this chapter, and is approved by the department pursuant to Section 42968.21.

(2) A carpet stewardship organization, as defined in Section 42971.

(q) “Producer responsibility plan” means the plan developed by the producer responsibility organization that complies with Section 42968.32 and is submitted to the department for approval pursuant to Section 42968.30.

(r) (1) “Recycle” or “recycling” means the process of sorting, cleansing, treating, and reconstituting materials that would otherwise ultimately be disposed of onto land or into water or the atmosphere, and returning them to, or maintaining them within, the economic mainstream in the form of recovered material for new, reused, or reconstituted products that meet the
 quality standards necessary to be used in the marketplace.

(2) “Recycle” or “recycling” does not include any of the following:

(A) Combustion.

(B) Incineration.

(C) Energy generation.

(D) Fuel production, except for anaerobic digestion of source separated organic materials.

(E) Other forms of disposal.

(3) To be considered recycled, covered products shall be sent to a responsible end market.

(s) “Retailer” means a person who offers new covered products in a retail sale, as defined in Section 6007
 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, including a retail sale through any means, including remote offerings such as sales outlets, catalogs, or an internet website, online marketplace, or other similar electronic means.

(t) (1) “Sell” or “sale” means a transfer of title of a covered product for consideration, including a remote sale conducted through a sales outlet, catalog, or internet website, online marketplace, or similar electronic means.

(2) “Sell” or “sale” includes a lease through which a covered product is provided to a consumer by a manufacturer, wholesaler, or retailer.

(3) For the purposes of this chapter, the sale of a covered product shall be deemed to occur in the state if the covered product is delivered to the consumer in the state.

(u) “Solid waste facility” means a solid waste facility, as defined in Section 40194, that accepts under its normal operating conditions covered materials for collection, storing, and handling, whether for recycling or disposal.

(v) “Wholesaler” means a person who offers new covered product for sale in this state in a sale that is not a retail sale, as defined in Section 6007 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and in which the covered product is intended to be resold.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   (AB 863)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42968.1.

The department shall adopt regulations to implement this chapter in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The regulations shall have an effective date no earlier than December 31, 2026.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   (AB 863)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42968.2.

Notwithstanding any other law, the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)) shall not apply to the requirements of this chapter, including the adoption of a producer responsibility plan, the determination of whether the producer responsibility organization’s annual report is compliant, or the performance standards published by the department pursuant to Sections 42968.32 and 42968.34.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   (AB 863)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42968.3.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit the ability of a permanent collection site that is a solid waste facility from charging for the disposal of a covered product that is contaminated or that will be rejected for recycling by the producer responsibility organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   (AB 863)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42968.4.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), a producer shall publish on its internet website, for each of its covered products, an environmental product declaration that identifies the components and the percentage of each component used in the covered product.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not require a producer to reveal a trade secret, as defined in Section 3426.1 of the Civil Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   (AB 863)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Producers and Producer Responsibility Organizations [42968.20. - 42968.24.]

42968.20.

(a) To comply with the requirements of this chapter, a producer shall establish and implement a stewardship program as part of a group of producers through membership in the producer responsibility organization.

(b) No later than 30 days after the effective date of regulations, each producer or the producer responsibility organization on behalf of the producers it represents shall notify the department, in writing, that the producer intends to register with the producer responsibility organization, which will submit a producer responsibility plan to the department.

(c) Each producer covered under the producer responsibility organization shall register with the producer
 responsibility organization in accordance with the procedures and requirements established by the producer responsibility organization and shall comply with those procedures and requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   (AB 863)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42968.21.

(a) The department shall approve a producer responsibility organization if it meets the requirements of this chapter, including all of the following:

(1) A governing board consisting of producers that represent the diversity of covered products placed in the market by those entities. The governing board shall include nonvoting members with representation from the following types of entities:

(A) A circular economy environmental nongovernmental organization.

(B) A retailer that sells covered products.

(C) A labor representative from a floor covering
 joint apprenticeship program in northern California that is approved by the Division of Apprenticeship Standards.

(D) A labor representative from a floor covering joint apprenticeship program in southern California that is approved by the Division of Apprenticeship Standards.

(2) The producer responsibility organization shall demonstrate in its producer responsibility plan that it has adequate financial responsibility and financial controls in place, including fraud prevention measures and an audit schedule, to ensure proper management of funds.

(3) The activities of the producer responsibility organization are limited to carrying out the requirements of this chapter.

(b) In the event that the department determines that the producer responsibility
 organization no longer meets the requirements of this chapter or fails to implement or administer an approved producer responsibility plan in a manner that effectuates the purposes of this chapter, the department may revoke its approval of the producer responsibility plan and may approve another producer responsibility plan pursuant to Section 42968.72.

(c) (1) Upon approval of a producer responsibility plan pursuant to Section 42968.30, or commencing January 1, 2029, whichever is sooner, a producer shall not sell, offer for sale, import, or distribute a covered product in the state unless all the following are met:

(A) The producer is a participant of the producer responsibility organization.

(B) The covered product is accounted for in the producer responsibility plan.

(C) The department has approved the producer responsibility plan.

(2) If a person does not qualify as a producer and is not subject to this chapter before January 1, 2029, but, after January 1, 2029, meets the definition of a producer, then that person shall become a participant of the producer responsibility organization and comply with the requirements of this chapter prior to beginning to sell, offer for sale, import, or distribute covered products in the state.

(d) A producer not in compliance with this chapter is subject to penalties pursuant to this chapter if a covered product sold or offered for sale by the producer is not subject to a producer responsibility plan that has been approved by the department pursuant to Section 42968.30.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   (AB 863)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42968.22.

(a) No later than 180 days after the effective date of this chapter, producers shall provide to the department, in a form and manner established by the department, all the following:

(1) The producer’s contact information, including its name, physical and mailing addresses, email address, and phone number.

(2) A list of covered products and brands of covered products that the producer sells, distributes for sale, imports for sale, or offers for sale in or into the state.

(b) A producer shall update the information described in subdivision (a) and provide the updated information to the department on or before
 January 15 of each year, within 30 days of changes to the information, and upon request of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   (AB 863)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42968.23.

(a) The producer responsibility organization shall establish a method for fully funding the producer responsibility organization in a manner that equitably distributes the producer responsibility organization’s costs among participating producers, reflecting California sales volumes. The funding mechanism shall demonstrate adequate funding for all administrative and operational costs of the producer responsibility plan, to be borne by participating producers, and modulate the distribution of participating producers’ costs based on the cost of managing their specific covered products according to the approved producer responsibility plan.

(b) (1) The producer responsibility organization shall include as an approved
 collection site under its producer responsibility plan a solid waste facility that offers in writing to participate in the producer responsibility plan and agrees to comply with any program operator requirements that are consistent with the approved producer responsibility plan.

(2) The producer responsibility organization shall include the solid waste facility as an approved collection site within 90 days of receiving the written offer to participate, confirming that the offering entity will comply with any producer responsibility organization requirements that are consistent with an approved producer responsibility plan.

(3) The producer responsibility organization shall not be required to respond to offers pursuant to this subdivision until its producer responsibility plan has been approved by the department.

(c) The producer responsibility organization may suspend or terminate use of an approved collection site that does not comply with all applicable state, federal, or municipal laws and regulations or adhere to the rules and conditions imposed by the producer responsibility organization pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 42968.32.

(d) A participant of the producer responsibility organization with an approved producer responsibility plan shall comply with the requirements of this chapter. The producer responsibility organization shall notify the department within 30 calendar days of any the following:

(1) The end of any three-month period in which the producer responsibility organization unsuccessfully attempted to obtain a fee, records, or information from a participant producer, or received incomplete or incorrect records or information required by this
 chapter.

(2) The date a producer no longer participates in the producer responsibility organization’s approved producer responsibility plan.

(3) Any instance of noncompliance by a participant producer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   (AB 863)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42968.24.

(a) The producer responsibility organization shall conduct a transparent and public consultation process with interested parties that may be impacted by this chapter, including, but not limited to, producers, wholesalers, retailers, service providers, consumers, local governments, installers, and public interest groups for all of the following activities:

(1) The development of a producer responsibility plan pursuant to Section 42968.30, which shall include at least two public workshops.

(2) The revision of a producer responsibility plan pursuant to Section 42968.30, which shall include at least two public workshops.

(b) The submittal of an annual report pursuant to Section 42968.62, which shall include at least one public workshop, that is conducted within 30 days after the submittal of each annual report.

(c) The producer responsibility organization shall provide no fewer than 20 days advanced public notice to interested parties to participate in a public workshop. The public notice shall clearly articulate the purpose of the participation, including, but not limited to, the topics that will be discussed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   (AB 863)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Producer Responsibility Plan [42968.30. - 42968.35.]

42968.30.

(a) Within 12 months of the effective date of the regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Section 42968.1, the producer responsibility organization shall develop and submit to the department a complete producer responsibility plan, in accordance with the requirements of this chapter, for the collection, transportation, recycling, and the safe and proper management of covered products in the state.

(b) (1) The department shall review the producer responsibility plan for compliance with this chapter and may approve or disapprove the producer responsibility plan within 120 days of receipt of the producer responsibility plan.

(2) If the department
 disapproves a revised producer responsibility plan, the department shall explain how the revised producer responsibility plan does not comply with this chapter and provide written notice to the producer responsibility organization within 60 days of disapproval.

(c) If the department disapproves a producer responsibility plan submitted by the producer responsibility organization, the department shall explain how the producer responsibility plan does not comply with this chapter and provide written notice to the producer responsibility organization within 60 days of disapproval. The producer responsibility organization may resubmit to the department a revised producer responsibility plan within 30 days of the date the written notice was issued, and the department shall review the revised producer responsibility plan within 60 days of its receipt of the resubmittal. The producer responsibility organization shall then revise and resubmit the
 producer responsibility plan consistent with the department’s direction within 30 days, otherwise the disapproval is final and the producer responsibility organization and producers may be subject to penalties. Within 24 months of the effective date of the regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Section 42968.1, the producer responsibility organization shall have a complete producer responsibility plan approved by the department and each producer shall be subject to an approved producer responsibility plan to be in compliance with this chapter.

(d) The approved producer responsibility plan shall be a public record, except that financial or sales data reported to the department by the producer responsibility organization is not a public record for purposes of the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) and shall not be open to public inspection. The department may
 release financial, production, or sales data in summary form only so the information cannot be attributable to a specific producer or to any other entity.

(e) For any producer responsibility plan currently in effect as of January 1, 2025, that producer responsibility plan shall continue in effect under its current terms and assessment structure, operating based on the law in effect at the time of producer responsibility plan approval, until that producer responsibility plan expires or is revoked, except that the producer responsibility organization shall submit a producer responsibility plan amendment by July 1, 2025, to conform that producer responsibility plan to the requirements in subdivisions (c) and (j) of Section 42968.32, and Sections 42968.60 and 42968.61.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   (AB 863)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42968.31.

The producer responsibility organization shall implement the approved producer responsibility plan within 12 months of the department’s approval of the producer responsibility plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   (AB 863)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42968.32.

A producer responsibility plan for covered products shall do all of the following:

(a) Be designed to accept and manage all postconsumer covered products.

(b) Include the name and contact information of each producer and brand covered under the producer responsibility plan. The contact information shall include the producer’s email address, phone number, and mailing and physical address.

(c) Explain the producer responsibility organization’s funding methods, and explain how those methods will fully fund the producer responsibility organization in a manner that equitably distributes the producer responsibility organization’s costs among the producers
 pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 42968.23.

(d) (1) Include the fee required by Section 42968.51 and a description of how it is calculated.

(2) Include the fee required by Section 42968.52, a description of how it is calculated, and an explanation of how it complies with Section 42968.52.

(e) Include a five-year budget that establishes a funding level sufficient to operate the producer responsibility organization in a prudent and responsible manner. The budget shall demonstrate how estimated revenues will cover all budgeted costs for each cost category. Budgeted costs shall include, but not be limited to, administrative costs, education and outreach costs, operational costs, capital costs, and a reserve.

(1) Administrative
 costs shall include the department’s actual and reasonable regulatory costs, which include full personnel costs, to implement and enforce this chapter as the criteria for all the costs are defined in the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 42968.1. For purposes of this paragraph, producer responsibility organization implementation begins once the department approves the producer responsibility organization’s producer responsibility plan, except the department’s costs shall include actual regulatory development costs and other startup costs incurred prior to producer responsibility plan submittal and approval.

(2) The reserve shall include funds to operate the producer responsibility organization should there be unexpected events, losses of income, or large unbudgeted expenses. It shall also protect the recycling infrastructure the producer responsibility organization relies on in its producer responsibility plan during any lapse in producer
 participation during the life of the program. The reserve cost category shall include a reserve level amount and description justifying the reserve level amount indicated. The producer responsibility organization shall maintain reserve funds sufficient to operate the producer responsibility plan for no less than six months. In the event that a new producer responsibility organization is approved by the department, the producer responsibility organization shall establish its reserve and maintain the required reserve fund balance by the end of the second year of producer responsibility plan operation. In the event that the producer responsibility organization’s producer responsibility plan expires or is revoked, the reserve balance shall be transferred to a successor producer responsibility organization or a trustee, pursuant to subdivision (j).

(f) Include quantifiable five-year and annual performance standards and metrics for each covered
 product category until such time as the department publishes performance standards pursuant to Section 42968.34. The producer responsibility organization shall amend its producer responsibility plan to meet the performance standards published by the department. Performance standards published by the department pursuant to this subdivision shall not be subject to the requirements of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). Performance standards may include, but are not limited to, collection, reduction in disposal, and maximizing recycling.

(g) (1) Describe how the producer responsibility organization will provide free dropoff and convenient collection system for covered products, which shall include approved collection sites in each county of the state that provide for a reasonable geographic spread of permanent collection
 sites and an explanation for the geographic spread.

(2) The department may by regulation adjust the minimum number of required approved collection sites described in paragraph (1) to ensure that consumers have sufficient convenient access to approved collection sites, applicable to a producer responsibility plan addressing collection of covered products, if the department has substantial evidence that allowing for this adjustment will increase the collection of covered products or is otherwise justified considering the population or geographic attributes of the county. For counties bordering another state, the number of approved collection sites within that county may include a facility located in an adjacent state if that facility is regularly involved in the management of that county’s solid waste and recyclables.

(h) Describe how approved collection sites will be authorized and
 managed, including all of the following:

(1) The process by which the producer responsibility organization will provide for the collection, storage, and transport of covered products from the approved collection sites to an authorized recycling facility.

(2) How the producer responsibility organization will ensure the cost-effective sorting of covered products using the best available technology to avoid any recyclable materials from being disposed.

(3) How the producer responsibility organization will maintain all collection and transport records and make them available to the department upon request.

(4) A list of all proposed rules, conditions, and requirements for authorized collectors, including a template proposed agreement.

(5) How the producer responsibility organization will maximize the recycling of covered products, including prioritizing reuse and closed loop recycling.

(6) How the producer responsibility organization will maximize the collection and reuse of convention carpet, including no less than 20 percent reuse by 2028.

(7) The process by which covered products will be managed following collection at approved collection sites, including:

(A) How covered products will be handled and managed according to the waste hierarchy as defined in Section 40051.

(B) How the producer responsibility organization will maximize the recycling of covered products.

(C) How the producer responsibility organization will minimize disposal of covered products collected by the producer responsibility organization.

(8) A description of the producer responsibility organization’s annual assessment and the metrics it will use to determine how collection, sorting, and transportation outcomes aligned with projections.

(9) How the producer responsibility organization will improve the collection, processing, and recycling operations for covered products, including, but not limited to, pilot programs to test new processes, methods, or equipment.

(10) How approved collection sites will be operated to ensure that covered products are collected at no cost, safely, and handled in accordance with all applicable state and federal laws.

(i) (1) Describe the statewide education and outreach program’s efforts to various audiences, including, but not limited to, consumers, commercial building owners, covered product installation contractors, construction and demolition contractors, retailers, and wholesalers to promote their participation in achieving the purposes of the producer responsibility plan. These education and outreach materials shall include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(A) Signage that is prominently displayed and easily visible.

(B) Written materials and templates of materials to be provided to covered product installation contractors and consumers at the time of purchase or delivery, or both.

(C) Promotional materials or activities, or both,
 that explain the purpose of the producer responsibility organization and the means by which it is being carried out.

(D) An internet website that publicizes the location of approved collection sites and provides information on how to drop off covered products at the free and convenient network of approved collection sites offered by the producer responsibility organization, including any information reasonably necessary to safely and conveniently access the collection and recycling services offered by the producer responsibility organization.

(E) All signage and materials required for approved collection sites by the producer responsibility organization, and a description of the method by which approved collection sites can access replacement materials at no cost to the approved collection site.

(F) A description of
 efforts to support participation by all California communities, including a description of efforts to communicate in languages other than English.

(G) A description of strategies, goals, and metrics used to determine the success of the producer responsibility plan implementation and statewide education and outreach program.

(2) The statewide education and outreach program shall promote the safe and proper management of covered products, including source reduction and environmentally preferable purchasing of covered products.

(3) The statewide education and outreach plan program shall include information for consumers about how to avoid improper disposal of covered products.

(4) The statewide education and outreach program shall include a survey to
 consumers and contractors regarding their awareness of the producer responsibility plan, their use of resources available to them under the producer responsibility plan, including collection sites, and why they do or do not use those resources. The survey shall occur once every three years.

(j) Include a contingency plan that takes effect in the event the producer responsibility plan expires or is revoked. The contingency plan shall guarantee that the contracts, financial data, and other necessary authority and assets to operate the program shall vest in a trustee approved by the department. The trustee shall operate the most recently approved producer responsibility plan, subject to the direction of the department, until that time as a new producer responsibility plan is approved. Upon producer responsibility plan expiration or revocation of the producer responsibility plan, the balance of the producer responsibility organization’s operating
 reserves collected pursuant to subdivision (d) shall be transferred to the control of the trustee within five calendar days, along with all documents, digital records, contracts, and files related to the operation of the producer responsibility plan.

(k) Allocate annual grants to apprenticeship programs for training apprentices and journey-level carpet installers in proper carpet recycling techniques, including installation and removal techniques that maximize the recyclability of carpet. The producer responsibility plan shall provide for annual grants to joint apprenticeship programs approved by the Division of Apprenticeship Standards to train carpet installers, with the amount divided evenly between programs in northern California and southern California.

(l) (1) Prioritize expenditure of assessments collected pursuant to Section 42972 on activities to
 carry out the producer responsibility plan in California.

(2) Consistent with paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 42972, commencing with the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and for each fiscal year thereafter, the program shall allocate 8 percent of assessments collected pursuant to Section 42972, as determined by the department, for grants to apprenticeship programs, subject to the requirements and conditions of this section. Any portion of the 8 percent that is not awarded and used in a fiscal year shall be credited to the amount to be allocated or awarded in the following fiscal year pursuant to this section, thereby reducing the amount allocated or awarded in the following fiscal year by the amount of the credit.

(3) An apprenticeship program shall apply to the producer responsibility organization for a grant. The apprenticeship program shall submit a report to the
 producer responsibility organization and the department outlining its expenditure of the grant funds for purposes of this program prior to receipt of new grants.

(m) Provide for the payment to an approved collection site for accepting, collecting, storing, transporting, and handling covered products in an amount determined by the approved collection site and the producer responsibility organization. Payment of these costs shall be reflected in the budget pursuant to subdivision (e).

(n) Explain how producers will, on and after January 1, 2027, through the use of a standardized stamping or some other means, provide a visual mark on the back of a covered product that is a synthetic material to allow expeditious sorting of the carpet, by 2027.

(o) Require carpet to contain 5 percent of postconsumer recycled carpet
 content by 2028. The department may, for the year 2029 and any year thereafter, set the rate for postconsumer recycled carpet to be required in carpet.

(p) Include written certification by an authorized representative of the producer responsibility organization that, at the time of submission to the department, the producer responsibility plan, including all aspects of the producer responsibility plan related to the collection, transportation, and management of covered products, is in compliance with all applicable state and federal laws and regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 169.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

42968.33.

A producer of a covered product sold, offered for sale, imported, or distributed in or into the state shall achieve the performance standards published by the department pursuant to Section 42968.34 with respect to each covered product.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   (AB 863)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42968.34.

(a) The department may establish, review, and may adjust performance standards based on information included in the producer responsibility plan and annual reports, other information provided by the producer responsibility organization, department waste characterization studies, and economic and any other relevant information.

(b) The department shall use sales data to establish the performance standard for recycling carpet. The department may decide how many years of sales data to use for establishing the performance standard and the producer responsibility organization may appeal that decision pursuant to appellate procedures established by the department in regulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   (AB 863)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

42968.35.

(a) The producer responsibility organization shall review its producer responsibility plan at least every five years after approval by the department and determine whether revisions to the producer responsibility plan are necessary.

(b) If the producer responsibility organization determines that revisions to the producer responsibility plan are necessary, the producer responsibility organization shall submit to the department a revised producer responsibility plan for review and approval employing the procedures set forth in Section 42968.30. The producer responsibility organization shall submit the revised producer responsibility plan pursuant to this subdivision at least 12 months prior to the deadline described in subdivision (a). The
 revised producer responsibility plan shall include a cover letter that summarizes the revisions to the producer responsibility plan.

(c) If the producer responsibility organization determines that no revisions to the producer responsibility plan are necessary, the producer responsibility organization shall send a letter to the department no later than 12 months prior to the review deadline described in subdivision (a), explaining that the producer responsibility organization has reviewed the producer responsibility plan and determined that no revisions are needed. The department may disapprove the producer responsibility organization’s determination within 30 days of receipt of that determination if the department concludes that the producer responsibility organization cannot implement the objectives of this chapter without revising the producer responsibility plan. In the event the department disapproves the producer responsibility
 organization’s determination, the producer responsibility organization shall submit to the department a revised producer responsibility plan for review and approval. The producer responsibility organization shall submit the revised producer responsibility plan pursuant to this subdivision within 60 days of receipt of the department’s disapproval, unless the department determines that additional time is needed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   (AB 863)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Mandatory Sorting [42968.40. - 42968.40.]

42968.40.
